District of Columbia statutes.
29-106.03

Reinstatement.

(a)

A domestic filing entity that is dissolved administratively under § 29-106.02 may apply to the Mayor for reinstatement. The application shall be signed by the entity and state:

(1)

The name of the entity at the time of its administrative dissolution and, if needed, a different name that satisfies § 29-103.01;

(2)

The address of the principal office of the entity and the name and address of the registered agent;

(3)

The effective date of the entity’s administrative dissolution; and

(4)

That the grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been cured.

(b)

To be reinstated, an entity shall pay all fees and penalties that were due to the Mayor at the time of its administrative dissolution and all fees and penalties that would have been due to the Mayor while the entity was dissolved administratively.

(c)

If the Mayor determines that an application under subsection (a) of this section contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section, is satisfied that the information is correct, and determines that all payments required to be made to the Mayor by subsection (b) of this section have been made, the Mayor shall cancel the statement of dissolution and prepare a statement of reinstatement that states the Mayor’s determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the statement, and serve a copy on the entity pursuant to § 29-104.12.

(d)

When reinstatement under this section is effective, it shall relate back to, and be effective, as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution, and the domestic filing entity shall resume carrying on its activities and affairs as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred, except for the rights of a person arising out of an act or omission in reliance on the dissolution before the person knew or had reason to know of the reinstatement.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(41), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-106.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “shall be signed by the entity and state” for “shall state‘ in the introductory language of (a); substituted “cured‘ for “eliminated‘ in (a)(4); twice deleted “taxes,‘ following “fees‘ in (b); in (c) substituted “an application under subsection (a) of this section‘ for “the application‘, and deleted “the original of‘ following “file‘; and substituted “activities and affairs‘ for “business‘ in (d).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.